Arkansas, session 2025, HB1124.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. REGULAR SALARIES - SHARED SERVICES. There is hereby
established for the Department of Finance and Administration - Shared
Services for the 2025-2026 fiscal year, the following maximum number of
regular employees.

Maximum Annual
Maximum Salary Rate
Item Class No. of Fiscal Year
No. Code Title Employees 2025-2026
(1) SC006 SECRETARY OF FINANCE & ADMINISTRATION 1 GRADE SE05
(2) U002U DFA DEPUTY DIRECTOR AND CHIEF OF STAFF 1 GRADE SE04
(3) N033N DFA ADMINISTRATIVE SVCS ADMINISTRATOR 1 GRADE SE02
(4) G001C DFA ASSISTANT ADMIN SVCS ADMINISTRATOR 1 GRADE GS15
(5) P006N DFA DIRECTOR OF COMMUNICATIONS 1 GRADE GS15
*JAP009*
03-18-2025 16:40:39 JAP009

As Engrossed: H3/18/25 HB1124
(6) G332C STATE INFRASTRUCTURE COORDINATOR 1 GRADE GS15
(7) A003C DFA REVENUE ASSISTANT ADMINISTRATOR 1 GRADE GS14
(8) R040C DFA STATEWIDE PROGRAM MANAGER 1 GRADE GS13
(9) A027C ACCOUNTING OPERATIONS MANAGER 1 GRADE GS11
(10) R013C AGENCY HUMAN RESOURCES MANAGER 1 GRADE GS11
(11) R041C DFA STATEWIDE PROGRAM COORDINATOR 3 GRADE GS11
(12) A082C ACCOUNTANT II 1 GRADE GS08
(13) R021C BUDGET ANALYST 1 GRADE GS08
(14) E023C TRAINING PROJECT MANAGER 1 GRADE GS08
(15) A089C ACCOUNTANT I 1 GRADE GS07
(16) V008C BUYER SUPERVISOR 1 GRADE GS07
(17) G132C DFA PROGRAM MANAGER 2 GRADE GS07
(18) C010C EXECUTIVE ASSISTANT TO THE DIRECTOR 1 GRADE GS07
(19) C037C ADMINISTRATIVE ANALYST 5 GRADE GS06
(20) R022C BENEFITS COORDINATOR 1 GRADE GS06
(21) V010C DFA BUYER 4 GRADE GS06
(22) C018C DFA EXECUTIVE ASSISTANT TO THE CMSNR 1 GRADE GS06
(23) R025C HUMAN RESOURCES ANALYST 9 GRADE GS06
(24) G179C LEGAL SERVICES SPECIALIST 1 GRADE GS06
(25) C022C BUSINESS OPERATIONS SPECIALIST 1 GRADE GS05
(26) A091C FISCAL SUPPORT ANALYST 2 GRADE GS05
MAX. NO. OF EMPLOYEES 45

SECTION 2. EXTRA HELP - SHARED SERVICES. There is hereby authorized,
for the Department of Finance and Administration - Shared Services for the
2025-2026 fiscal year, the following maximum number of part-time or temporary
employees, to be known as "Extra Help", payable from funds appropriated
herein for such purposes: twenty (20) temporary or part-time employees, when
needed, at rates of pay not to exceed those provided in the Uniform
Classification and Compensation Act, or its successor, or this act for the
appropriate classification.

SECTION 3. APPROPRIATION - SHARED SERVICES. There is hereby
appropriated, to the Department of Finance and Administration, to be payable
from the State Central Services Fund, for personal services and operating
expenses of the Department of Finance and Administration - Shared Services
03-18-2025 16:40:39 JAP009

As Engrossed: H3/18/25 HB1124
for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) REGULAR SALARIES $3,006,694
(02) EXTRA HELP 60,000
(03) PERSONAL SERVICES MATCHING 1,049,119
(04) MAINT. & GEN. OPERATION
(A) OPER. EXPENSE 418,450
(B) CONF. & TRAVEL 41,368
(C) PROF. FEES 154,000
(D) CAP. OUTLAY 0
(E) DATA PROC. 0
TOTAL AMOUNT APPROPRIATED $4,729,631

SECTION 4. REGULAR SALARIES - BUDGET AND MANAGEMENT SERVICES. There is
hereby established for the Department of Finance and Administration - Budget
and Management Services Division for the 2025-2026 fiscal year, the following
maximum number of regular employees.

Maximum Annual
Maximum Salary Rate
Item Class No. of Fiscal Year
No. Code Title Employees 2025-2026
(1) N012N DFA DEPUTY DIRECTOR AND CONTROLLER 2 GRADE SE03
(2) D004N DFA INTERGOVERNMENTAL SVCS ADMIN 1 GRADE SE02
(3) N038N DFA BUDGET ADMINISTRATOR 1 GRADE SE02
(4) N011N DFA CHIEF INFORMATION OFFICER 1 GRADE SE02
(5) N042N DFA TAX RESEARCH ADMINISTRATOR 1 GRADE SE02
(6) D005N DFA IT TECHNICAL SPECIALIST 7 GRADE IT11
(7) D002C DFA OIS ASSISTANT ADMINISTRATOR 1 GRADE IT10
(8) D011C DFA ERP SYSTEM MANAGER 4 GRADE IT09
(9) D021C DFA ERP GROUP LEAD 6 GRADE IT08
(10) D007C INFORMATION SYSTEMS MANAGER 2 GRADE IT08
(11) D030C INFORMATION SYSTEMS COORDINATOR 1 GRADE IT07
(12) D028C SENIOR SOFTWARE SUPPORT SPECIALIST 3 GRADE IT07
03-18-2025 16:40:39 JAP009

As Engrossed: H3/18/25 HB1124
(13) D033C DFA ERP ANALYST 32 GRADE IT06
(14) D039C NETWORK SUPPORT SPECIALIST 1 GRADE IT06
(15) D038C SENIOR SOFTWARE SUPPORT ANALYST 5 GRADE IT06
(16) D016C SENIOR TECHNOLOGY ANALYST 4 GRADE IT06
(17) D054C COMPUTER SUPPORT COORDINATOR 1 GRADE IT05
(18) D063C COMPUTER SUPPORT SPECIALIST 2 GRADE IT05
(19) D061C INFORMATION SYSTEMS COORDINATION SPEC 1 GRADE IT05
(20) D052C SOFTWARE SUPPORT ANALYST 8 GRADE IT05
(21) D056C SYSTEMS COORDINATION ANALYST 1 GRADE IT05
(22) D058C COMPUTER OPERATIONS COORDINATOR 1 GRADE IT04
(23) D065C NETWORK SUPPORT ANALYST 6 GRADE IT04
(24) D064C WEBSITE DEVELOPER 2 GRADE IT04
(25) D071C COMPUTER SUPPORT ANALYST 5 GRADE IT03
(26) D084C COMPUTER OPERATOR 2 GRADE IT02
(27) D079C COMPUTER SUPPORT TECHNICIAN 3 GRADE IT02
(28) A002C DFA ASSISTANT ACCOUNTING ADMINISTRATOR 3 GRADE GS15
(29) R002C DFA ASSISTANT BUDGET ADMINISTRATOR 2 GRADE GS15
(30) A001C DFA ASSISTANT TAX RESEARCH ADMINISTRATOR 1 GRADE GS14
(31) A006C DFA REVENUE TAX DIVISION MANAGER 1 GRADE GS13
(32) R040C DFA STATEWIDE PROGRAM MANAGER 7 GRADE GS13
(33) A021C AGENCY CONTROLLER I 2 GRADE GS12
(34) A025C DFA ACCOUNTING ACFR COORDINATOR 5 GRADE GS12
(35) G002C DFA ASSISTANT IGS ADMINISTRATOR 1 GRADE GS12
(36) A007C AUDIT MANAGER 1 GRADE GS11
(37) R041C DFA STATEWIDE PROGRAM COORDINATOR 28 GRADE GS11
(38) R043C DFA STATEWIDE PROGRAM SPECIALIST 4 GRADE GS09
(39) G109C GRANTS MANAGER 3 GRADE GS09
(40) A082C ACCOUNTANT II 1 GRADE GS08
(41) A047C FINANCIAL ANALYST II 1 GRADE GS08
(42) A089C ACCOUNTANT I 7 GRADE GS07
(43) G133C DFA DIVISION MANAGER I 1 GRADE GS07
(44) G132C DFA PROGRAM MANAGER 3 GRADE GS07
(45) G147C GRANTS COORDINATOR 5 GRADE GS07
(46) A065C PAYROLL SERVICES COORDINATOR 1 GRADE GS07
(47) C037C ADMINISTRATIVE ANALYST 5 GRADE GS06
(48) A074C FISCAL SUPPORT SUPERVISOR 1 GRADE GS06
03-18-2025 16:40:39 JAP009

As Engrossed: H3/18/25 HB1124
(49) G180C GRANTS ANALYST 9 GRADE GS06
(50) A091C FISCAL SUPPORT ANALYST 1 GRADE GS05
(51) D077C HELP DESK SPECIALIST 4 GRADE GS05
(52) E051C STAFF DEVELOPMENT SPECIALIST 1 GRADE GS05
(53) A098C FISCAL SUPPORT SPECIALIST 5 GRADE GS04
MAX. NO. OF EMPLOYEES 207

SECTION 5. EXTRA HELP - BUDGET AND MANAGEMENT SERVICES. There is
hereby authorized, for the Department of Finance and Administration - Budget
and Management Services Division for the 2025-2026 fiscal year, the following
maximum number of part-time or temporary employees, to be known as "Extra
Help", payable from funds appropriated herein for such purposes: twelve (12)
temporary or part-time employees, when needed, at rates of pay not to exceed
those provided in the Uniform Classification and Compensation Act, or its
successor, or this act for the appropriate classification.

SECTION 6. APPROPRIATION - BUDGET AND MANAGEMENT SERVICES - OPERATIONS.
There is hereby appropriated, to the Department of Finance and
Administration, to be payable from the State Central Services Fund, for
personal services and operating expenses of the Department of Finance and
Administration - Budget and Management Services Division for the fiscal year
ending June 30, 2026, the following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) REGULAR SALARIES $14,002,675
(02) EXTRA HELP 130,000
(03) PERSONAL SERVICES MATCHING 4,716,355
(04) OVERTIME 5,000
(05) MAINT. & GEN. OPERATION
(A) OPER. EXPENSE 1,500,000
(B) CONF. & TRAVEL 75,000
(C) PROF. FEES 211,000
(D) CAP. OUTLAY 100,000
(E) DATA PROC. 0
TOTAL AMOUNT APPROPRIATED $20,740,030
03-18-2025 16:40:39 JAP009

As Engrossed: H3/18/25 HB1124

SECTION 7. APPROPRIATION - BUDGET AND MANAGEMENT SERVICES -
MISCELLANEOUS CASH. There is hereby appropriated, to the Department of
Finance and Administration, to be payable from the cash fund deposited in the
State Treasury as determined by the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State, for
operating expenses of the Department of Finance and Administration - Budget
and Management Services Division for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026,
the following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) MAINT. & GEN. OPERATION
(A) OPER. EXPENSE $35,000
(B) CONF. & TRAVEL 0
(C) PROF. FEES 5,000
(D) CAP. OUTLAY 0
(E) DATA PROC. 0
(02) REFUNDS/REIMBURSEMENTS 300,000
TOTAL AMOUNT APPROPRIATED $340,000

SECTION 8. EXTRA HELP - BUDGET AND MANAGEMENT SERVICES - VICTIMS OF
CRIME JUSTICE ASSISTANCE - FEDERAL. There is hereby authorized, for the
Department of Finance and Administration - Budget and Management Services
Division for the 2025-2026 fiscal year, the following maximum number of part-
time or temporary employees, to be known as "Extra Help", payable from funds
appropriated herein for such purposes: one (1) temporary or part-time
employees, when needed, at rates of pay not to exceed those provided in the
Uniform Classification and Compensation Act, or its successor, or this act
for the appropriate classification.

SECTION 9. APPROPRIATION - BUDGET AND MANAGEMENT SERVICES - VICTIMS OF
CRIME JUSTICE ASSISTANCE - FEDERAL. There is hereby appropriated, to the
Department of Finance and Administration - Budget and Management Services
Division, to be payable from the federal funds as designated by the Chief
Fiscal Officer of the State, for personal services, operating expenses and
administration of federal funds received through the Federal Victims of Crime
03-18-2025 16:40:39 JAP009

As Engrossed: H3/18/25 HB1124
Act, Stop Violence Against Women Act, and the Family Violence Prevention and
Services Act for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) REGULAR SALARIES $521,862
(02) EXTRA HELP 6,272
(03) PERSONAL SERVICES MATCHING 212,388
(04) OVERTIME 2,500
(05) MAINT. & GEN. OPERATION
(A) OPER. EXPENSE 150,000
(B) CONF. & TRAVEL 13,000
(C) PROF. FEES 74,219
(D) CAP. OUTLAY 0
(E) DATA PROC. 0
(06) GRANTS AND AID - STATEWIDE VIOLENCE
PREVENTION ACTIVITIES 30,440,304
(07) REFUNDS/REIMBURSEMENTS 78,125
(08) GRANTS MGMT SYSTEM 200,000
TOTAL AMOUNT APPROPRIATED $31,698,670

SECTION 10. APPROPRIATION - BUDGET AND MANAGEMENT SERVICES - VICTIMS OF
CRIME JUSTICE ASSISTANCE - STATE. There is hereby appropriated, to the
Department of Finance and Administration - Budget and Management Services
Division, to be payable from the Miscellaneous Agencies Fund Account, for
grants-in-aid to state agencies, local governments, and nonprofit
organizations for matching funds to implement approved programs through the
Victims of Crime Justice Assistance Program for the fiscal year ending June
30, 2026, the following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) VICTIMS OF CRIME JUSTICE ASSISTANCE
PROGRAM MATCHING GRANTS $359,196

SECTION 11. APPROPRIATION - BUDGET AND MANAGEMENT SERVICES - DEPARTMENT
03-18-2025 16:40:39 JAP009

As Engrossed: H3/18/25 HB1124
OF JUSTICE NON-VICTIM ASSISTANCE GRANTS - FEDERAL. There is hereby
appropriated, to the Department of Finance and Administration - Budget and
Management Services Division, to be payable from the federal funds as
designated by the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State, for personal services,
operating expenses and distribution of federal funds to state agencies, local
governments and entities that support improvements in the State's criminal
justice system for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) REGULAR SALARIES $169,991
(02) PERSONAL SERVICES MATCHING 81,485
(03) MAINT. & GEN. OPERATION
(A) OPER. EXPENSE 168,129
(B) CONF. & TRAVEL 3,500
(C) PROF. FEES 205,000
(D) CAP. OUTLAY 0
(E) DATA PROC. 0
(04) GRANTS/AID - DEPT OF JUSTICE
NON-VICTIM ASSISTANCE MATCHING GRANTS 4,000,000
(05) REFUNDS/REIMBURSEMENTS 200,000
TOTAL AMOUNT APPROPRIATED $4,828,105

SECTION 12. APPROPRIATION - BUDGET AND MANAGEMENT SERVICES - DEPARTMENT
OF JUSTICE NON-VICTIM ASSISTANCE GRANTS - STATE. There is hereby
appropriated, to the Department of Finance and Administration - Budget and
Management Services Division, to be payable from the Miscellaneous Agencies
Fund Account, for grants and aid to state agencies and local governments for
matching funds and to implement or sustain approved drug law enforcement,
violent offender, substance abuse and other non-victim assistance program
grants for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) DEPT OF JUSTICE NON-VICTIM ASSISTANCE
MATCHING GRANTS $1,000,000
03-18-2025 16:40:39 JAP009

As Engrossed: H3/18/25 HB1124

SECTION 13. APPROPRIATION - BUDGET AND MANAGEMENT SERVICES -
INFORMATION TECHNOLOGY. There is hereby appropriated, to the Department of
Finance and Administration, to be payable from the State Central Services
Fund, for personal services and operating expenses of the Department of
Finance and Administration - Budget and Management Services Division for the
fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) INFORMATION TECHNOLOGY SERVICES $31,000,000
(02) AASIS BILLINGS 15,200,000
(03) IT APPRENTICESHIP PROGRAM 150,000
TOTAL AMOUNT APPROPRIATED $46,350,000

SECTION 14. APPROPRIATION - BUDGET AND MANAGEMENT SERVICES - STATEWIDE
PAYROLL PAYING. There is hereby appropriated, to the Department of Finance
and Administration - Budget and Management Services Division, to be payable
from the paying account as determined by the Chief Fiscal Officer of the
State, for providing disbursement of personal services of the various state
agencies as a result of the consolidation to one federal identification
number for all state agencies in the State of Arkansas for the fiscal year
ending June 30, 2026, the following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) STATEWIDE PAYROLL PAYING $50,000

SECTION 15. APPROPRIATION - BUDGET AND MANAGEMENT SERVICES - DOMESTIC
VIOLENCE SHELTER FUND. There is hereby appropriated, to the Department of
Finance and Administration, to be payable from the Domestic Violence Shelter
Fund, for statewide grants awarded to a statewide domestic violence entity
under the Arkansas Domestic Violence Shelter Act of the Department of Finance
and Administration - Budget and Management Services Division for the fiscal
year ending June 30, 2026, the following:

03-18-2025 16:40:39 JAP009

As Engrossed: H3/18/25 HB1124
ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) DOMESTIC VIOLENCE SHELTER GRANTS $100,000

SECTION 16. APPROPRIATION - BUDGET AND MANAGEMENT SERVICES - PROJECT
SAFE NEIGHBORHOODS. There is hereby appropriated, to the Department of
Finance and Administration, to be payable from the federal funds as
designated by the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State, for personal services,
operating expenses, and grants and aid related to Project Safe Neighborhoods
of the Department of Finance and Administration - Budget and Management
Services Division for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) REGULAR SALARIES $27,467
(02) PERSONAL SERVICES MATCHING 13,976
(03) MAINT. & GEN. OPERATION
(A) OPER. EXPENSE 4,946
(B) CONF. & TRAVEL 11,320
(C) PROF. FEES 0
(D) CAP. OUTLAY 0
(E) DATA PROC. 0
(04) GRANTS & AID - PROJECT SAFE
NEIGHBORHOODS 349,550
TOTAL AMOUNT APPROPRIATED $407,259

SECTION 17. APPROPRIATION - BUDGET AND MANAGEMENT SERVICES -
COMPREHENSIVE OPIOID ABUSE PROGRAM. There is hereby appropriated, to the
Department of Finance and Administration, to be payable from the federal
funds as designated by the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State, for personal
services, operating expenses, and grants and aid related to the Comprehensive
Opioid Abuse Program of the Department of Finance and Administration - Budget
and Management Services Division for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026,
the following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
03-18-2025 16:40:39 JAP009

As Engrossed: H3/18/25 HB1124
NO. 2025-2026
(01) REGULAR SALARIES $158,475
(02) PERSONAL SERVICES MATCHING 112,291
(03) MAINT. & GEN. OPERATION
(A) OPER. EXPENSE 295,597
(B) CONF. & TRAVEL 74,902
(C) PROF. FEES 263,290
(D) CAP. OUTLAY 0
(E) DATA PROC. 0
(04) GRANTS & AID - COMPREHENSIVE OPIOID
ABUSE PROGRAM 6,955,800
TOTAL AMOUNT APPROPRIATED $7,860,355

SECTION 18. APPROPRIATION - CHILD ABUSE AND NEGLECT PROGRAMS. There is
hereby appropriated, to the Department of Finance and Administration, to be
payable from the Miscellaneous Agencies Fund Account, for child abuse and
neglect expenses and grants for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the
following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) CHILD ABUSE AND NEGLECT PROGRAM
EXPENSES $5,251,521

SECTION 19. APPROPRIATION - CHILDREN'S ADVOCACY CENTERS OF ARKANSAS.
There is hereby appropriated, to the Department of Finance and
Administration, to be payable from the Arkansas Children's Advocacy Center
Fund, for grants to children's advocacy centers in Arkansas for the fiscal
year ending June 30, 2026, the following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) CHILDREN'S ADVOCACY CENTERS GRANTS $500,000

SECTION 20. REGULAR SALARIES - BUDGET AND MANAGEMENT SERVICES -
DEVELOPMENTAL DISABILITIES PLANNING COUNCIL. There is hereby established for
03-18-2025 16:40:39 JAP009

As Engrossed: H3/18/25 HB1124
the Department of Finance and Administration - Budget and Management Services
Division for the 2025-2026 fiscal year, the following maximum number of
regular employees.

Maximum Annual
Maximum Salary Rate
Item Class No. of Fiscal Year
No. Code Title Employees 2025-2026
(1) U127U EXEC DIR DEVLPMTL DISABILITIES COUNCIL 1 GRADE GS11
(2) G109C GRANTS MANAGER 1 GRADE GS09
(3) G147C GRANTS COORDINATOR 2 GRADE GS07
(4) C022C BUSINESS OPERATIONS SPECIALIST 1 GRADE GS05
MAX. NO. OF EMPLOYEES 5

SECTION 21. APPROPRIATION - BUDGET AND MANAGEMENT SERVICES -
DEVELOPMENTAL DISABILITIES PLANNING COUNCIL - STATE. There is hereby
appropriated, to the Department of Finance and Administration, to be payable
from the Miscellaneous Agencies Fund Account, for personal services of the
Department of Finance and Administration - Budget and Management Services
Division - Developmental Disabilities Planning Council - State for the fiscal
year ending June 30, 2026, the following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) REGULAR SALARIES $28,407
(02) PERSONAL SERVICES MATCHING 9,118
TOTAL AMOUNT APPROPRIATED $37,525

SECTION 22. APPROPRIATION - BUDGET AND MANAGEMENT SERVICES -
DEVELOPMENTAL DISABILITIES PLANNING COUNCIL - FEDERAL. There is hereby
appropriated, to the Department of Finance and Administration, to be payable
from the federal funds as designated by the Chief Fiscal Officer of the
State, for personal services, operating experiences and grants and aid of the
Department of Finance and Administration - Budget and Management Services
Division - Developmental Disabilities Planning Council - Federal for the
fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the following:
03-18-2025 16:40:39 JAP009

As Engrossed: H3/18/25 HB1124

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) REGULAR SALARIES $282,710
(02) PERSONAL SERVICES MATCHING 103,389
(03) MAINT. & GEN. OPERATION
(A) OPER. EXPENSE 259,025
(B) CONF. & TRAVEL 10,843
(C) PROF. FEES 120,000
(D) CAP. OUTLAY 0
(E) DATA PROC. 0
(04) GRANTS AND AID 1,190,929
TOTAL AMOUNT APPROPRIATED $1,966,896

SECTION 23. REGULAR SALARIES - REVENUE SERVICES DIVISION. There is
hereby established for the Department of Finance and Administration - Revenue
Services Division for the 2025-2026 fiscal year, the following maximum number
of regular employees.

Maximum Annual
Maximum Salary Rate
Item Class No. of Fiscal Year
No. Code Title Employees 2025-2026
(1) N003N DFA DEP DIR AND COMMISSIONER OF REVENUE 1 GRADE SE03
(2) N035N DFA MOTOR VEHICLE ADMINISTRATOR 1 GRADE SE02
(3) N004N DFA REV ASST COMMISSIONER POLICY & LEGAL 1 GRADE SE02
(4) G002N DFA REVENUE CHIEF COUNSEL 1 GRADE SE02
(5) N030N DFA STATE REVENUE OFFICE ADMINISTRATOR 1 GRADE SE02
(6) N029N DFA TAX ADMINISTRATOR 2 GRADE SE02
(7) N028N DFA TAX AUDIT ADMINISTRATOR 1 GRADE SE02
(8) D054C COMPUTER SUPPORT COORDINATOR 1 GRADE IT05
(9) D056C SYSTEMS COORDINATION ANALYST 1 GRADE IT05
(10) D084C COMPUTER OPERATOR 1 GRADE IT02
(11) A003C DFA REVENUE ASSISTANT ADMINISTRATOR 12 GRADE GS14
(12) A006C DFA REVENUE TAX DIVISION MANAGER 11 GRADE GS13
(13) R040C DFA STATEWIDE PROGRAM MANAGER 1 GRADE GS13
03-18-2025 16:40:39 JAP009

As Engrossed: H3/18/25 HB1124
(14) G004C MANAGING ATTORNEY 6 GRADE GS13
(15) G310C TAX APPEALS STAFF ATTORNEY 4 GRADE GS13
(16) G025C ATTORNEY SUPERVISOR 4 GRADE GS12
(17) G024C DEPARTMENT ADMINISTRATIVE LAW JUDGE 3 GRADE GS12
(18) A014C FISCAL DIVISION MANAGER 5 GRADE GS12
(19) G047C ATTORNEY SPECIALIST 12 GRADE GS11
(20) G044C DFA REVENUE PROBLEM RESOLUTION OFFICER 2 GRADE GS11
(21) R041C DFA STATEWIDE PROGRAM COORDINATOR 6 GRADE GS11
(22) A033C TAX AUDITOR SUPERVISOR 21 GRADE GS11
(23) G061C ACD DEPUTY DIRECTOR 1 GRADE GS10
(24) A049C DFA REVENUE OFFICE DISTRICT MANAGER 5 GRADE GS10
(25) G045C DFA DIVISION MANAGER III 10 GRADE GS09
(26) T106C DFA REVENUE SECURITY SUPERVISOR 1 GRADE GS09
(27) R043C DFA STATEWIDE PROGRAM SPECIALIST 1 GRADE GS09
(28) P004C PUBLIC INFORMATION MANAGER 1 GRADE GS09
(29) A054C TAX AUDITOR II 172 GRADE GS09
(30) G084C DFA DIVISION MANAGER II 7 GRADE GS08
(31) G133C DFA DIVISION MANAGER I 18 GRADE GS07
(32) A069C DFA REVENUE OFFICE ASST DISTRICT MNGR 5 GRADE GS07
(33) T032C DFA REVENUE SECURITY COORDINATOR 4 GRADE GS07
(34) S017C MAINTENANCE COORDINATOR 2 GRADE GS07
(35) E040C STAFF DEVELOPMENT COORDINATOR 1 GRADE GS07
(36) A059C TAX AUDITOR 2 GRADE GS07
(37) C037C ADMINISTRATIVE ANALYST 6 GRADE GS06
(38) A077C DFA LOCAL REVENUE OFFICE MANAGER 53 GRADE GS06
(39) E033C DFA ORGANIZATIONAL DEVELOPMENT SPEC 1 GRADE GS06
(40) A074C FISCAL SUPPORT SUPERVISOR 4 GRADE GS06
(41) C029C HEARING OFFICER 26 GRADE GS06
(42) G179C LEGAL SERVICES SPECIALIST 5 GRADE GS06
(43) B076C RESEARCH PROJECT ANALYST 2 GRADE GS06
(44) E046C TRAINING INSTRUCTOR 1 GRADE GS06
(45) S041C BOILER OPERATOR 6 GRADE GS05
(46) C022C BUSINESS OPERATIONS SPECIALIST 2 GRADE GS05
(47) A094C DFA LOCAL REVENUE OFFICE SUPERVISOR 88 GRADE GS05
(48) C042C DFA REVENUE SUPERVISOR 33 GRADE GS05
(49) A091C FISCAL SUPPORT ANALYST 20 GRADE GS05
03-18-2025 16:40:39 JAP009

As Engrossed: H3/18/25 HB1124
(50) R032C HUMAN RESOURCES PROGRAM REPRESENTATIVE 1 GRADE GS05
(51) V015C PURCHASING SPECIALIST 1 GRADE GS05
(52) C056C ADMINISTRATIVE SPECIALIST III 12 GRADE GS04
(53) C048C DFA SUPERVISOR 92 GRADE GS04
(54) A098C FISCAL SUPPORT SPECIALIST 2 GRADE GS04
(55) A102C FISCAL SUPPORT TECHNICIAN 6 GRADE GS04
(56) C046C LEGAL SUPPORT SPECIALIST 2 GRADE GS04
(57) S046C MAINTENANCE TECHNICIAN 1 GRADE GS04
(58) C073C ADMINISTRATIVE SPECIALIST II 28 GRADE GS03
(59) C059C DFA SERVICE REPRESENTATIVE 780 GRADE GS03
(60) S064C SKILLED TRADES HELPER 2 GRADE GS03
(61) X172C TAX INVESTIGATOR 33 GRADE GS03
(62) S087C INSTITUTIONAL SERVICES ASSISTANT 10 GRADE GS01
MAX. NO. OF EMPLOYEES 1,545

SECTION 24. EXTRA HELP - REVENUE SERVICES DIVISION. There is hereby
authorized, for the Department of Finance and Administration - Revenue
Services Division for the 2025-2026 fiscal year, the following maximum number
of part-time or temporary employees, to be known as "Extra Help", payable
from funds appropriated herein for such purposes: eighty (80) temporary or
part-time employees, when needed, at rates of pay not to exceed those
provided in the Uniform Classification and Compensation Act, or its
successor, or this act for the appropriate classification.

SECTION 25. APPROPRIATION - REVENUE SERVICES DIVISION - OPERATIONS.
There is hereby appropriated, to the Department of Finance and
Administration, to be payable from the State Central Services Fund, for
personal services and operating expenses of the Department of Finance and
Administration - Revenue Services Division for the fiscal year ending June
30, 2026, the following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) REGULAR SALARIES $68,627,649
(02) EXTRA HELP 400,000
(03) PERSONAL SERVICES MATCHING 28,257,216
03-18-2025 16:40:39 JAP009

As Engrossed: H3/18/25 HB1124
(04) OVERTIME 500,000
(05) MAINT. & GEN. OPERATION
(A) OPER. EXPENSE 24,990,000
(B) CONF. & TRAVEL 106,000
(C) PROF. FEES 100,000
(D) CAP. OUTLAY 600,000
(E) DATA PROC. 0
TOTAL AMOUNT APPROPRIATED $123,580,865

SECTION 26. APPROPRIATION REVENUE SERVICES DIVISION - DRIVER
SERVICES/MOTOR VEHICLES PROGRAM. There is hereby appropriated, to the
Department of Finance and Administration, to be payable from the Commercial
Driver License Fund, for personal services and operating expenses of the
Department of Finance and Administration - Revenue Services Division - Driver
Services/Motor Vehicles Program for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the
following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) REGULAR SALARIES $330,510
(02) PERSONAL SERVICES MATCHING 152,309
(03) OVERTIME 30,000
(04) MAINT. & GEN. OPERATION
(A) OPER. EXPENSE 5,352,352
(B) CONF. & TRAVEL 0
(C) PROF. FEES 0
(D) CAP. OUTLAY 0
(E) DATA PROC. 0
TOTAL AMOUNT APPROPRIATED $5,865,171

SECTION 27. APPROPRIATION - REVENUE SERVICES DIVISION - INDIVIDUAL
INCOME TAX AND AD VALOREM PROPERTY TAX REBATES. There is hereby
appropriated, to the Department of Finance and Administration - Revenue
Services Division, to be payable from the Individual Income Tax Withholding
Fund, for the purpose of making individual income tax refunds of taxes
withheld under the provisions of Arkansas Code beginning at 26-51-901 and
03-18-2025 16:40:39 JAP009

As Engrossed: H3/18/25 HB1124
property tax rebates under Amendment 79 of the Arkansas Constitution for the
fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) INDIVIDUAL INCOME TAX & AD VALOREM
PROPERTY TAX REBATES - REFUND/REIMB $780,000,000

SECTION 28. APPROPRIATION - REVENUE SERVICES DIVISION - CORPORATE
INCOME TAX. There is hereby appropriated, to the Department of Finance and
Administration - Revenue Services Division, to be payable from the Corporate
Income Tax Withholding Fund, for the purpose of making corporate income tax
refunds of taxes withheld under the provisions of Arkansas Code 26-51-901 for
the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) CORPORATE INCOME TAX -
REFUND/REIMBURSEMENTS $200,000,000

SECTION 29. APPROPRIATION - REVENUE SERVICES DIVISION - GASOLINE TAX
REFUNDS. There is hereby appropriated, to the Department of Finance and
Administration - Revenue Services Division, to be payable from the Gasoline
Tax Refund Fund, for paying the valid gasoline tax refund claims of
agricultural users and bus drivers in the manner and to the extent provided
by law for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) GASOLINE TAX REFUND CLAIMS $1,500,000

SECTION 30. APPROPRIATION - REVENUE SERVICES DIVISION - INTERSTATE
MOTOR FUEL TAX REFUNDS. There is hereby appropriated, to the Department of
Finance and Administration - Revenue Services Division, to be payable from
the Interstate Motor Fuel Tax Refund Fund, for paying refunds to interstate
users of motor fuels and special motor fuels as authorized by law for the
03-18-2025 16:40:39 JAP009

As Engrossed: H3/18/25 HB1124
fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) INTERSTATE MOTOR FUEL TAX -
REFUND/REIMBURSEMENTS $10,000,000

SECTION 31. APPROPRIATION - REVENUE SERVICES DIVISION - MISCELLANEOUS
TAX REFUNDS. There is hereby appropriated, to the Department of Finance and
Administration - Revenue Services Division, to be payable from the
Miscellaneous Revolving Fund, for making refunds of taxes erroneously paid
and for refunds of the gross receipts taxes paid upon tickets to athletic
events pursuant to Arkansas Code 26-52-412 and for other purposes as
authorized by law for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) MISCELLANEOUS TAX -
REFUND/REIMBURSEMENTS $175,000,000

SECTION 32. APPROPRIATION - REVENUE SERVICES DIVISION - SPECIAL PLATES.
There is hereby appropriated, to the Department of Finance and Administration
- Revenue Services Division, to be payable from the cash fund deposited in
the State Treasury as determined by the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State,
for administrative and operating expenses of disbursing the Motor Vehicle
Special License Plate fees to the proper entities for the fiscal year ending
June 30, 2026, the following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) MV SPECIAL PLATES-ADMINISTRATIVE &
OPERATING EXPENSES $5,000,000

SECTION 33. APPROPRIATION - REVENUE SERVICES DIVISION - REVENUE
MISCELLANEOUS CASH. There is hereby appropriated, to the Department of
Finance and Administration - Revenue Services Division, to be payable from
03-18-2025 16:40:39 JAP009

As Engrossed: H3/18/25 HB1124
the cash fund deposited in the State Treasury as determined by the Chief
Fiscal Officer of the State, for distribution of fees and service charges
collected on behalf of other entities and for other purposes as authorized by
law for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) DISTRIBUTION OF FEES / SERVICE CHARGES $100,000

SECTION 34. SPECIAL LANGUAGE. NOT TO BE INCORPORATED INTO THE ARKANSAS
CODE NOR PUBLISHED SEPARATELY AS SPECIAL, LOCAL AND TEMPORARY LAW. SHARED
SERVICES. (a)(1) The Chief Fiscal Officer of the State may create a Shared
Services paying accounts on his or her books and on the books of the
Treasurer of State and the Auditor of State for the payment of personal
services and operating expenses in the Shared Services Paying Account
Appropriation by the Department of Finance and Administration.
(2) The Chief Fiscal Officer of the State shall direct the transfer
of funds and appropriations to the Shared Services Paying Account
appropriation section of this act on the books of the Treasurer of State, the
Auditor of State, and the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State.
(3) The transfer authority provided to the department in
subdivision (a)(2) of this section may be used to make transfers only within
the department's appropriation act or between other appropriation acts
authorized for the department.
(4) The provisions of this section shall be in effect from the date of
passage through June 30, 2025 2026.

SECTION 35. SPECIAL LANGUAGE. NOT TO BE INCORPORATED INTO THE ARKANSAS
CODE NOR PUBLISHED SEPARATELY AS SPECIAL, LOCAL AND TEMPORARY LAW. BUDGET
AND MANAGEMENT SERVICES - DEPARTMENT OF JUSTICE NON-VICTIM ASSISTANCE GRANTS.
The funds appropriated in this Act for Department of Justice Non-Victim
Assistance Matching Grants shall be used for matching funds for administering
the Federal Grants provided in this Act for the Department of Justice Non-
Victim Assistance Grants. The Department of Finance and Administration -
Budget and Management Services Division is hereby authorized to call upon all
state agencies to assist in the implementation of the Department of Justice
03-18-2025 16:40:39 JAP009

As Engrossed: H3/18/25 HB1124
Non-Victim Assistance Grants. However, if no Federal Grants are available to
be matched with these funds, the funding provided from the Miscellaneous
Agencies Fund Account may be used to provide funding for Drug Task Force
operations across the State. The funds appropriated in this Act for
Department of Justice Non-Victim Assistance Matching Grants may be used to
provide one hundred percent (100%) of the required matching funds for state
agencies and to provide up to sixty percent (60%) of the required matching
funds for local governments should Federal Grants be available. Such funds
and appropriation may be transferred to eligible state agencies or paid to
local governments to be used for matching federal funds for administration of
the Department of Justice Non-Victim Assistance Grants or paid to local
governments to be used to fund Drug Task Force operations in such amounts as
determined by the Arkansas Alcohol and Drug Abuse Coordinating Council or
other oversight agency as designated by the Governor. Any unobligated
balances in funds in this Act for the Department of Justice Non-Victim
Assistance Grants may be used by state agencies as matching funds for other
U.S. Department of Justice Grants in an amount determined by the Chief Fiscal
Officer of the State.
Any unexpended balances in funds provided for Department of Justice Non-
Victim Assistance Matching Grants in this act remaining on June 30, 2024
2025, may be carried forward and used for the same purpose during the fiscal
year ending June 30, 2025 2026.
The provisions of this section shall be in effect only from July 1, 2024
2025 through June 30, 2025 2026.

SECTION 36. SPECIAL LANGUAGE. NOT TO BE INCORPORATED INTO THE ARKANSAS
CODE NOR PUBLISHED SEPARATELY AS SPECIAL, LOCAL AND TEMPORARY LAW. REVENUE
SERVICES DIVISION - APPROPRIATION TRANSFERS. The Secretary of the Department
of Finance and Administration is authorized to transfer appropriation between
refund line item appropriations in this Act. The Secretary of the Department
of Finance and Administration shall immediately report any such transfers to
the Arkansas Legislative Council or Joint Budget Committee. Such report
shall contain the amounts transferred and the reasons for the same.
The provisions of this section shall be in effect only from July 1, 2024
2025 through June 30, 2025 2026.

03-18-2025 16:40:39 JAP009

As Engrossed: H3/18/25 HB1124
SECTION 37. SPECIAL LANGUAGE. NOT TO BE INCORPORATED INTO THE ARKANSAS
CODE NOR PUBLISHED SEPARATELY AS SPECIAL, LOCAL AND TEMPORARY LAW. REVENUE
SERVICES DIVISION - EXTRA HELP EXEMPTION. Extra Help positions authorized
herein are specifically exempt from limitation of hours, either by act or
regulation. Provided, however, when a temporary or part-time employee is
employed by the Department of Finance and Administration - Revenue Services
Division for a period of time exceeding seven (7) months, a report of such
shall be filed with the Arkansas Legislative Council or Joint Budget
Committee.
The provisions of this section shall be in effect only from July 1, 2024
2025 through June 30, 2025 2026.

SECTION 38. SPECIAL LANGUAGE. NOT TO BE INCORPORATED INTO THE ARKANSAS
CODE NOR PUBLISHED SEPARATELY AS SPECIAL, LOCAL AND TEMPORARY LAW. REVENUE
SERVICES DIVISION - AUTHORITY TO EMPLOY CERTIFIED LAW ENFORCEMENT OFFICERS.
The Secretary of the Department of Finance and Administration is authorized
to employ certified law enforcement officers and specialized police personnel
as certified under § 12-9-101 et seq. The certified law enforcement officers
and specialized police personnel employed under this section shall be
responsible for maintaining order and providing for the security, protection,
and safety of the Department of Finance and Administration buildings,
grounds, property, employees and customers. The certified law enforcement
officer shall have the powers, duties, privileges, and immunities of a
certified law enforcement officer.
The following two classifications shall be used by the agency for
security, protection, and safety personnel:
Maximum Salary Rate
Item Class No. of Fiscal Year
No. Code Title Employees 2024-2025 2025-2026
(1) T106C DFA REVENUE SECURITY SUPERVISOR 1 GRADE GS09
(2) T032C DFA REVENUE SECURITY COORDINATOR 4 GRADE GS07
MAX. NO. OF EMPLOYEES 5

Department of Finance and Administration Alcoholic Beverage Control
Enforcement Division will manage training and certification of the certified
law enforcement officers and specialized police personnel and maintain all
03-18-2025 16:40:39 JAP009

As Engrossed: H3/18/25 HB1124
required documentation.
The provisions of this section shall be in effect only from July 1, 2024
2025 through June 30, 2025 2026.

SECTION 39. COMPLIANCE WITH OTHER LAWS. Disbursement of funds
authorized by this act shall be limited to the appropriation for such agency
and funds made available by law for the support of such appropriations; and
the restrictions of the State Procurement Law, the General Accounting and
Budgetary Procedures Law, the Revenue Stabilization Law, the Regular Salary
Procedures and Restrictions Act, or their successors, and other fiscal
control laws of this State, where applicable, and regulations promulgated by
the Department of Finance and Administration, as authorized by law, shall be
strictly complied with in disbursement of said funds.

SECTION 40. LEGISLATIVE INTENT. It is the intent of the General
Assembly that any funds disbursed under the authority of the appropriations
contained in this act shall be in compliance with the stated reasons for
which this act was adopted, as evidenced by the Agency Requests, Executive
Recommendations and Legislative Recommendations contained in the budget
manuals prepared by the Department of Finance and Administration, letters, or
summarized oral testimony in the official minutes of the Arkansas Legislative
Council or Joint Budget Committee which relate to its passage and adoption.

SECTION 41. EMERGENCY CLAUSE. It is found and determined by the
General Assembly, that the Constitution of the State of Arkansas prohibits
the appropriation of funds for more than a one (1) year period; that the
effectiveness of this Act on July 1, 2025 is essential to the operation of
the agency for which the appropriations in this Act are provided, and that in
the event of an extension of the legislative session, the delay in the
effective date of this Act beyond July 1, 2025 could work irreparable harm
upon the proper administration and provision of essential governmental
programs. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this Act
being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health
and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after July 1, 2025.

/s/Joint Budget Committee
03-18-2025 16:40:39 JAP009